Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3638.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5 of chapter 6E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
(d) The commission shall not certify, or shall revoke certification of, a law enforcement
agency that is at any time out of compliance with section 6 of this chapter.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 6E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 6. (a) A law enforcement agency shall not employ, hire, contract with, or in any
way retain the services of any individual who was hired as a sworn officer or otherwise of or
otherwise provided services as an agent of or adviser to the United States immigration and
customs enforcement on or after January 20, 2025.
(b) This section applies prospectively only and does not apply to any individual hired by
a law enforcement agency prior to this act’s effective date.
of 1